Illinois, session 104th, SB589.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 1.1 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/1.1)  (from Ch. 116, par. 201.1)7    Sec. 1.1. This Act may be cited as the the Freedom of 8Information Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-1475.)